District of Columbia statutes.
5-545.06a

Council authorized to change or suspend provisions.

(a)

The Council of the District of Columbia is authorized to change or suspend by resolution the provisions of §§ 5-541.01, 5-542.01, 5-542.02, 5-542.03, 5-543.01, 5-543.02, 5-543.03, 5-543.04, 5-543.05, 5-544.01, 5-545.01, and 5-545.03 insofar as they relate to officers and members of the Metropolitan Police Department and the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department.

(b)

The Council’s authority to act pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be effective beginning on January 1, 1980.

Aug. 1, 1958, 72 Stat. 486, Pub. L. 85-584, title V, § 506a
as added June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 201, 45 DCR 2464
This section is referenced in § 5-541.01.
1981 Ed., § 4-420.1.
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 3 of Comprehensive Merit Personnel Act Pay Limit Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-36, October 23, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 6554).
For temporary addition of this section, see § 3 of the Comprehensive Merit Personnel Act Pay Limit Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-115, July 18, 1997, 44 DCR 4501), § 3 of the Comprehensive Merit Personnel Act Pay Limit Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-179, October 30, 1997, 44 DCR 6948), and § 3 of the Comprehensive Merit Personnel Act Pay Limit Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-378, June 5, 1998, 45 DCR 4466).

Construction of Law 12-124

Section 301 of D.C. Law 12-124 provided that nothing in the act shall be construed as superseding the provisions of the National Capital Revitalization and Self-Government Improvement Act of 1997, approved August 5, 1997 (Public Law 105-33; 111 Stat. 712), except that § 47-395.4(b)(3) is expressly superseded. Further, nothing in the act shall be construed as superseding the provisions of § 47-391.1 et seq. or of § 164 of the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 1998, approved November 19, 1997 (Public Law 105-100; 111 Stat. 2160).